ja: サドルの素材: カーボンファイバー; フォーム; レザー; 金属; マイクロファイバー; ナイロン; プラスチック; ポリプロピレン (PP); ゴム; スチール; チタン; ビニール; その他
bg-BG: Материал на седалката: Въглеродни влакна; Пяна; Кожа; Метал; Микрофибър; Найлон; Пластмаса; Полипропилен (PP); Каучук; Стомана; Титан; Винил; Други
cs: Materiál sedla: Uhlíkové vlákno; Pěna; Kůže; Kov; Mikrovlákno; Nylon; Plast; Polypropylen (PP); Guma; Ocel; Titanové; Vinylové; Jiné
nl: Zadelmateriaal: Koolstofvezel; Schuim; Leer; Metaal; Microvezel; Nylon; Plastic; Polypropyleen (PP); Rubber; Staal; Titanium; Vinyl; Andere
en: Saddle material: Carbon fiber; Foam; Leather; Metal; Microfiber; Nylon; Plastic; Polypropylene (PP); Rubber; Steel; Titanium; Vinyl; Other
vi: Chất liệu yên xe: Sợi carbon; Bọt xốp; Da; Kim loại; Vải xơ vi mảnh; Nylon; Nhựa; Polypropylene (PP); Cao su; Thép; Titanium; Nhựa vinyl; Khác
es: Material del sillín: Fibra de carbono; Espuma; Cuero; Metal; Microfibra; Nylon; Plástico; Polipropileno (PP); Goma; Acero; Titanio; Vinilo; Otros
pl: Materiał siodełka: Włókno węglowe; Piana; Skórzane; Metal; Mikrofibra; Nylon; Tworzywo sztuczne; Polipropylen (PP); Guma; Stal; Titanium; Winyl; Inne
zh-TW: 座墊材質: 碳纖維; 泡棉; 皮製; 金屬; 超細纖維; 尼龍; 塑膠; 聚丙烯 (PP); 橡膠; 鋼; 鈦; 乙烯基; 其他
lt-LT: Balnelio medžiaga: Anglies pluoštas; Porolonas; Oda; Metalas; Mikropluoštas; Nailonas; Plastikas; Polipropilenas (PP); Kaučiukas; Plienas; Titanas; Vinilas; Kita
fr: Matériau de la selle: Fibre de carbone; Mousse; Cuir; Métal; Microfibre; Nylon; Plastique; Polypropylène (PP); Caoutchouc; Acier; Titane; Vinyl; Autre
th: วัสดุสำหรับอาน: เส้นใยคาร์บอน; โฟม; หนัง; โลหะ; ไมโครไฟเบอร์; ไนลอน; พลาสติก; โพลิโพรพิลีน (PP); ยาง; เหล็ก; ไทเทเนียม; ไวนิล; อื่นๆ
nb: Salmateriale: Karbonfiber; Skum; Skinn; Metall; Mikrofiber; Nylon; Plast; Polypropylen (PP); Gummi; Stål; Titan; Vinyl; Annet
sk-SK: Materiál sedla: Uhlíkové vlákno; Pena; Koža; Kov; Mikrovlákno; Nylon; Plast; Polypropylén (PP); Guma; Oceľ; Titán; Vinyl; Iné
pt-BR: Material da sela: Fibra de carbono; Espuma; Couro; Metal; Microfibra; Nylon; Plástico; Polipropileno (PP); Borracha; Aço; Titânio; Vinil; Outro
da: Sadelmateriale: Kulfiber; Skum; Læder; Metal; Mikrofiber; Nylon; Plast; Polypropylen (PP); Gummi; Stål; Titanium; Vinyl; Andet
pt-PT: Material do selim: Fibra de carbono; Espuma; Pele; Metal; Microfibra; Náilon; Plástico; Polipropileno (PP); Borracha; Aço; Titânio; Vinil; Outro
it: Materiale del sellino: Fibra di carbonio; Schiuma; Pelle; Metallo; Microfibra; Nylon; Plastica; Polipropilene (PP); Gomma; Acciaio; Titanio; Vinile; Altro
ru: Материал седла: Углеродное волокно; Поролон; Кожа; Металл; Микрофибра; Нейлон; Пластик; Полипропилен (ПП); Резина; Сталь; Титан; Винил; Другой
sv: Sadelmaterial: Kolfiber; Skum; Läder; Metall; Mikrofiber; Nylon; Plast; Polypropen (PP); Gummi; Stål; Titan; Vinyl; Övrigt
zh-CN: 鞍座材质: 碳纤维; 泡沫; 皮革; 金属; 超细纤维; 尼龙; 塑料; 聚丙烯 (PP); 橡胶; 钢; 钛; 乙烯基贴纸; 其他
ro-RO: Material șa: Fibră de carbon; Spumă; Piele; Metal; Microfiber; Nailon; Plastic; Polipropilenă (PP); Cauciuc; Oțel; Titan; Vinyl; Altele
de: Sattelmaterial: Kohlenstofffaser; Schaumstoff; Leder; Metall; Mikrofaser; Nylon; Kunststoff; Polypropylen (PP); Gummi; Stahl; Titan; Vinyl; Sonstiges
el: Υλικό σέλας: Ανθρακόνημα; Αφρός; Δερμάτινο; Μέταλλο; Μικροΐνες; Νάιλον; Πλαστικό; Πολυπροπυλένιο (PP); Καουτσούκ; Χάλυβας; Τιτάνιο; Βινύλιο; Άλλο
hr-HR: Materijal sjedala: Karbonska vlakna; Pjena; Koža; Metal; Mikrovlakna; Najlon; Plastika; Polipropilen (PP); Guma; Čelik; Titanij; Vinil; Ostalo
hu: Nyereg anyaga: Szénszál; Hab; Bőr; Fém; Mikroszálas; Nejlon; Műanyag; Polipropilén (PP); Gumi; Acél; Titán; Vinil; Egyéb
ko: 안장 소재: 탄소 섬유; 거품; 가죽; 금속; 극세사; 나일론; 플라스틱; 폴리프로필렌(PP); 고무; 강철; 티타늄; 비닐; 기타
fi: Satulan materiaali: Hiilikuitu; Vaahto; Nahka; Metalli; Mikrokuitu; Nailon; Muovi; Polypropeeni (PP); Kumi; Teräs; Titaani; Vinyyli; Muu
sl-SI: Material sedeža: Ogljikova vlakna; Pena; Usnje; Kovina; Mikrovlakna; Najlon; Plastika; Polipropilen (PP); Guma; Jeklo; Titan; Vinil; Drugo
tr: Sele malzemesi: Karbon fiber; Köpük; Deri; Metal; Mikrofiber; Plastik; Plastik; Polipropilen (PP); Kauçuk; Çelik; Titanyum; Vinil; Diğer